en: Protractors
xx: Protractors
cs: Úhloměry
da: Vinkelmålere
de: Winkelmesser
es: Transportadores de ángulos
fr: Rapporteurs
it: Goniometri
ja: 分度器
nl: Gradenbogen
no: Transportører
pl: Kątomierze
pt: Transferidores
ru: Угломеры
sv: Gradskivor
tr: Açıölçerler

en: Rebar Locators
xx: Rebar Locators
cs: Detektory ocelových výztuží
da: Armeringsstangsøger
de: Stahlbewehrungssucher
es: Pachómetros
fr: Détecteurs d'armatures
it: Localizzatori di tondini
ja: 鉄筋探知機
nl: Betonwapeningsdetectoren
no: Armeringsdetektorer
pl: Wykrywacze prętów zbrojeniowych
pt: Localizadores de barras de reforço
ru: Локаторы арматуры
sv: Armeringsdetektorer
tr: Betonarme Demiri Bulucular

en: Rulers
xx: Rulers
cs: Pravítka
da: Linealer
de: Zollstöcke
es: Reglas
fr: Règles
it: Righelli
ja: 定規
nl: Linialen
no: Linjaler
pl: Linijki
pt: Réguas
ru: Линейки
sv: Linjaler
tr: Cetveller

en: Seismometer
xx: Seismometer
cs: Seismometry
da: Seismometre
de: Seismographen
es: Sismómetro
fr: Sismographes
it: Sismografo
ja: 地震計
nl: Seismometer
no: Seismografer
pl: Sejsmometry
pt: Sismógrafo
ru: Сейсмометры
sv: Seismometrar
tr: Sismometreler

en: Sound Meters
xx: Sound Meters
cs: Hlukoměry
da: Lydmålere
de: Lautstärkemesser
es: Sonómetros
fr: Sonomètres
it: Fonometri
ja: 騒音計
nl: Geluidsmeters
no: Lydmålere
pl: Sonometry
pt: Medidores de som
ru: Измерители интенсивности шума
sv: Ljudmätare
tr: Ses Ölçerler

en: Squares
xx: Squares
cs: Úhelníky
da: Vinkler
de: Winkel
es: Escuadras
fr: Équerres de traçage et de charpentier
it: Squadre
ja: スコヤ
nl: Winkelhaken
no: Vinkelhaker
pl: Kątowniki
pt: Esquadros
ru: Угольники
sv: Vinkelhakar
tr: Gönyeler

en: Straight Edges
xx: Straight Edges
cs: Rýsovací pravítka
da: Retskinner
de: Haarlineale
es: Escantillones
fr: Règles droites
it: Righe
ja: 直定規
nl: Rechte linialen
no: Rettholter
pl: Linijki bez podziałki
pt: Escalímetros
ru: Поверочные линейки
sv: Rätskivor
tr: Düz Kenarlar

en: Stud Sensors
xx: Stud Sensors
cs: Detektory trámů a nosníků
da: Sømfindere
de: Balkensucher
es: Sensores de viga
fr: Détecteurs de montants
it: Sensori tubi e cavi
ja: スタッドセンサー
nl: Steunbalkdetectoren
no: Stendersensorer
pl: Wykrywacze profili
pt: Sensores de vigas
ru: Детекторы неоднородностей
sv: Regeldetektorer
tr: Dikme Dedektörleri

en: Tape Measures
xx: Tape Measures
cs: Měřicí pásma
da: Målebånd
de: Maßbänder
es: Cinta métrica
fr: Mètres à ruban
it: Flessometri
ja: メジャー
nl: Rolmaten
no: Målebånd
pl: Taśmy miernicze
pt: Fitas métricas
ru: Мерные ленты
sv: Måttband
tr: Şerit Metreler

en: Theodolites
xx: Theodolites
cs: Teodolity
da: Teodolitter
de: Theodolite
es: Teodolitos
fr: Théodolites
it: Teodoliti
ja: セオドライト
nl: Theodolieten
no: Teodolitter
pl: Teodolity
pt: Teodolitos
ru: Теодолиты
sv: Teodoliter
tr: Teodolitler

en: Thermal Imaging Cameras
xx: Thermal Imaging Cameras
cs: Diagnostické termokamery
da: Diagnostiske termiske kameraer
de: Wärmekameras
es: Cámaras térmicas de diagnóstico por imagen
fr: Caméras thermiques
it: Telecamere termografiche
ja: 赤外線サーモグラフィ
nl: Thermografische camera's
no: Termografikameraer
pl: Kamery termowizyjne
pt: Câmeras termográficas de diagnóstico
ru: Тепловизоры
sv: Värmekameror för diagnostik
tr: Termal Görüntüleme Kameraları

en: Thermocouples & Thermopiles
xx: Thermocouples & Thermopiles
cs: Termočlánky
da: Termoelementer
de: Thermoelemente & -säulen
es: Termopares y termopilas
fr: Thermocouples et thermopiles
it: Termocoppie e termopile
ja: サーモカップル
nl: Thermokoppels
no: Termoelementer og termosøyler
pl: Termopary
pt: Termopares
ru: Термоэлементы
sv: Temperaturgivare
tr: Termokupllar ve Termopiller

en: Transducers
xx: Transducers
cs: Snímače
da: Tryksensorer og transducere
de: Transducer & Messumformer
es: Transductores
fr: Transducteurs
it: Trasduttori
ja: トランスデューサー
nl: Omzetters
no: Transdusere
pl: Przetworniki
pt: Transdutores
ru: Измерительные преобразователи
sv: Trycksensorer och -omvandlare
tr: Transdüserler

en: UV Light Meters
xx: UV Light Meters
cs: Měřiče ultrafialového záření
da: UV-lysmålere
de: UV-Lichtmesser
es: Medidores de luz ultravioleta
fr: Appareils de mesure UV
it: Esposimetri UV
ja: 紫外線強度計
nl: Meters voor UV-licht
no: UV-lysmålere
pl: Mierniki UV
pt: Fotômetros UV
ru: Измерители ультрафиолетового света
sv: UV-ljusmätare
tr: Ultraviyole Işıkölçerler

en: Vibration Meters
xx: Vibration Meters
cs: Měřiče vibrací
da: Vibrationsmålere
de: Schwingungsmesser
es: Medidores de vibración
fr: Vibromètres
it: Misuratori di vibrazioni
ja: 振動計
nl: Vibratiemeters
no: Vibrasjonsmålere
pl: Wibrometry
pt: Medidores de vibração
ru: Виброметры
sv: Vibrationsmätare
tr: Titreşim Ölçerler

en: Weather Forecasters & Stations
xx: Weather Forecasters & Stations
cs: Domácí meteostanice
da: Vejrstationer
de: Wetterstationen
es: Previsiones y estaciones meteorológicas
fr: Dispositifs de prévisions météorologiques et stations météo
it: Stazioni meteorologiche
ja: 気象計
nl: Weerstations
no: Værstasjoner
pl: Stacje pogodowe
pt: Meteorologistas e estações meteorológicas
ru: Устройства для прогноза погоды
sv: Väderstationer och väderprognosutrustning
tr: Hava Tahmin Cihaz ve İstasyonları

en: pH Meters
xx: pH Meters
cs: pH metry
da: pH-målere
de: pH-Meter
es: Medidores de pH
fr: pH-mètres
it: Piaccametri
ja: pHメーター
nl: pH-meters
no: pH-målere
pl: Mierniki pH
pt: Medidores de pH
ru: pH-метры
sv: pH-mätare
tr: pH Ölçerler

en: Milling Machines
xx: Milling Machines
cs: Frézovací stroje
da: Fræsemaskiner
de: Mühlen
es: Fresadoras
fr: Fraiseuses
it: Fresatrici
ja: フライス盤
nl: Freesmachines
no: Fresemaskiner
pl: Frezarki
pt: Máquinas de fresar
ru: Фрезерные станки
sv: Fräsmaskiner
tr: Freze Makineleri

en: Multifunction Power Tools
xx: Multifunction Power Tools
cs: Multifunkční elektrické nářadí
da: Multifunktionelle værktøjer
de: Multifunktionales Elektrowerkzeug
es: Herramientas eléctricas y multifunción
fr: Outils électriques multi-usages
it: Utensili elettrici multifunzione
ja: マルチ電動工具
nl: Multifunctionele elektrische apparaten
no: Elektrisk flerfunksjonsverktøy
pl: Elektronarzędzia wielofunkcyjne
pt: Ferramentas elétricas multifuncionais
ru: Многофункциональные электрические инструменты
sv: Multifunktionsverktyg
tr: Çok İşlevli Elektrikli Aletler

en: Nail Pullers
xx: Nail Pullers
cs: Vytahovače hřebíků
da: Knibtange
de: Nageleisen
es: Sacaclavos
fr: Arrache-clous
it: Levachiodi
ja: 釘抜き
nl: Spijkertrekkers
no: Spikertrekkere
pl: Wyciągacze gwoździ
pt: Alicates de unha
ru: Гвоздодёры
sv: Spikutdragare
tr: Çivi Sökme Aletleri